North Dakota statutes. TITLE 15 Education
CHAPTER 15-18.2 State Aid for Institutions of Higher Education

15-18.2-01.
Credit-hours — Determination.

For each institution under its control, the state board of higher education shall determine the number of credit-hours completed by students during the two-year period ending June thirtieth of each odd-numbered year.

For purposes of this section, a completed credit-hour is one for which a student met all institutional requirements and obtained a passing grade.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 138, § 1.

15-18.2-02.
Weighted credit-hours — Determination — Instructional program classification factors — Submission to legislative management.

In order to determine the weighted credit-hours for each institution under its control, the state board of higher education shall multiply each of an institution’s completed credit-hours, as determined under section 15-18.2-01, by an instructional program classification factor, as set forth in this section.

The factors for credits completed in agriculture are:

1.9 for lower division credits;

3.8 for upper division credits;

5.7 for professional level credits; and

7.6 for graduate level credits.

The factors for credits completed in architecture are:

1.8 for lower division credits;

3.6 for upper division credits;

5.4 for professional level credits; and

7.2 for graduate level credits.

The factors for credits completed in transportation are:

1.9 for lower division credits;

3.8 for upper division credits;

5.7 for professional level credits; and

7.6 for graduate level credits.

The factors for credits completed in the biological and physical sciences are:

1.9 for lower division credits;

3.8 for upper division credits;

5.7 for professional level credits; and

7.6 for graduate level credits.

The factors for credits completed in business are:

1.9 for lower division credits;

3.8 for upper division credits;

5.7 for professional level credits; and

7.6 for graduate level credits.

The factors for credits completed in education are:

1.9 for lower division credits;

3.8 for upper division credits;

5.7 for professional level credits; and

7.6 for graduate level credits.

The factors for credits completed in engineering are:

2.5 for lower division credits;

5.0 for upper division credits;

7.5 for professional level credits; and

10.0 for graduate level credits.

The factors for credits completed in the health sciences are:

3.0 for lower division credits;

6.0 for upper division credits;

9.0 for professional level credits;

12.0 for graduate level credits; and

34.5 for medical school credits.

The factors for credits completed in legal studies are:

3.5 for lower division credits;

7.0 for upper division credits;

14.0 for professional level credits; and

14.0 for graduate level credits.

The factors for credits completed in the core disciplines are:

1.0 for lower division credits;

2.0 for upper division credits;

3.0 for professional level credits; and

4.0 for graduate level credits.

The factors for credits completed in career and technical education are:

3.0 for lower division credits; and

5.0 for upper division credits.

The factor for completed basic skills credits is 2.3.

The state board of higher education shall ensure that all delineations in this section reflect the requirements of a nationally recognized and standardized instructional program classification system.

Before adopting any changes to the delineations implemented in accordance with this section, the state board of higher education shall present the proposed changes to and receive the approval of the legislative management.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 138, § 1; 2015, ch. 3, § 13, effective July 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 3, § 15, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 31, § 11, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 13 of chapter 3, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

15-18.2-03.
Credit completion factor — Determination.

Except as provided in subsections 2 and 3 of this section, for each institution under its control, the state board of higher education shall multiply the product determined under section 15-18.2-02 by a factor of:

1.00 if the number of credit-hours is at least 240,000;

1.05 if the number of credit-hours is at least 180,000 but less than 240,000;

1.10 if the number of credit-hours is at least 135,000 but less than 180,000;

1.15 if the number of credit-hours is at least 130,000 but less than 135,000;

1.20 if the number of credit-hours is at least 120,000 but less than 130,000;

1.30 if the number of credit-hours is at least 70,000 but less than 120,000;

1.40 if the number of credit-hours is at least 60,000 but less than 70,000;

1.50 if the number of credit-hours is at least 50,000 but less than 60,000;

1.60 if the number of credit-hours is at least 40,000 but less than 50,000;

1.70 if the number of credit-hours is at least 30,000 but less than 40,000; and

1.80 if the number of credit-hours is less than 30,000.

If the number of credit-hours completed by an institution would cause a decrease in the credit completion factor for that institution compared to the credit completion factor the institution was entitled to receive during the 2017-19 biennium, the state board of higher education shall multiply the product determined under section 15-18.2-02 by a credit growth factor of 1.0 for credits in excess of the factor the institution was entitled to receive during the 2017-19 biennium. Any weighted credit-hours multiplied by a credit growth factor under this section must have a weight of 1.0 under section 15-18.2-02. The state board of higher education shall multiply the remaining weighted credits by the credit completion factor the institution was entitled to receive during the 2017-19 biennium.

For purposes of this section, the number of credit-hours must be those determined by the state board of higher education in accordance with section 15-18.2-01.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 138, § 1; 2015, ch. 3, § 14, effective July 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 31, § 12, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 14 of chapter 3, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

15-18.2-04.
Institutional size factor — Determination. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 138, § 1; 2015, ch. 3, § 15, effective July 1, 2015; repealed by 2021, ch. 31, § 18, effective July 1, 2021.

15-18.2-05.
Base funding — Determination of state aid.

Except as provided under subsections 2 and 3, to determine the state aid payment to which each institution under its control is entitled, the state board of higher education shall multiply the product determined under section 15-18.2-03 by a base amount of:

$61.81 in the case of North Dakota state university and the university of North Dakota;

$92.60 in the case of Dickinson state university, Mayville state university, Minot state university, and Valley City state university; and

$98.84 in the case of Bismarck state college, Dakota college at Bottineau, Lake Region state college, North Dakota state college of science, and Williston state college.

For institutions under subdivision b of subsection 1, the state board of higher education shall multiply the product determined under section 15-18.2-03 for credits completed in instructional programs under subdivision k of subsection 1 of section 15-18.2-02 by the base amount under subdivision c of subsection 1.

For institutions under subdivision c of subsection 1, the state board of higher education shall multiply the product determined under section 15-18.2-03 for upper division credits completed in instructional programs under subdivisions a through j of subsection 1 of section 15-18.2-02 by the base amount under subdivision b of subsection 1.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 138, § 1; 2015, ch. 3, § 16, effective July 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 28, § 8, effective July 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 3, § 16, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 31, § 13, effective July 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 132, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 16 of chapter 3, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

Section 15-18.2-05 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 1 of Chapter 132, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2032; and Section 13 of Chapter 31, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2003.

Section 2 of chapter 138, S.L. 2013 provides: “

LEGISLATIVE INTENT.

In order to maintain the integrity of the funding formula established under this chapter, it is the intent of the legislative assembly that any proposed increases in the funding of institutions be achieved through the amendment of section 15-18.2-05.”

15-18.2-07.
Funding — Distribution.

The state aid to which each institution is entitled under this chapter must be forwarded at the time and in the manner agreed to by the institution and the office of management and budget.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 138, § 1.

15-18.2-08.
Statement of tuition and fees — Contents of statement.

Each tuition and fee billing statement provided to a student must include information identifying the average dollar amount of state aid per student per semester the institution receives under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 140, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.